Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.17.030

Limitation on liability of directors—Indemnification.

The provisions of RCW 23B.08.320 and 23B.08.500 through 23B.08.600 shall apply to any corporation, other than a municipal corporation, incorporated under the laws of the state of Washington.

[ 1989 c 165 s 190.]